Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
PART 7. Transition.

§ 8.9A-701.
Effective date.

This title takes effect on July 1, 2001.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-702.
Savings clause.

Preeffective-date transactions or liens. Except as otherwise provided in this part, this title applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before this title takes effect.

Continuing validity. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) and §§

8.9A-703

through

8.9A-709

:

transactions and liens that were not governed by former Title 8.9, were validly entered into or created before this title takes effect, and would be subject to this title if they had been entered into or created after this title takes effect, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those transactions and liens remain valid after this title takes effect; and

the transactions and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required or permitted by this title or by the law that otherwise would apply if this title had not taken effect.

Preeffective-date proceedings. This title does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before this title takes effect.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-703.
Security interest perfected before effective date.

Continuing priority over lien creditor; perfection requirements satisfied. A security interest that is enforceable immediately before this title takes effect and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected security interest under this title if, when this takes effect, the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under this title are satisfied without further action.

Continuing priority over lien creditor; perfection requirements not satisfied. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-705

, if, immediately before this title takes effect, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, but the applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under this title are not satisfied when this takes effect, the security interest:

is a perfected security interest for one year after this takes effect;

remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest becomes enforceable under §

8.9A-203

before the year expires; and

remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this title are satisfied before the year expires.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a lien, pledge or security interest granted by the Commonwealth or a governmental unit of the Commonwealth prior to July 1, 2001, which is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, shall remain enforceable and continue to have such priority on or after July 1, 2001.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2001, cc. 289, 296.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 289 and 296 are identical, and added subsection (c).

§ 8.9A-704.
Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before this title takes effect but which would be subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

remains an enforceable security interest for one year after this takes effect;

remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under §

8.9A-203

when this title takes effect or within one year thereafter; and

becomes perfected:

without further action, when this title takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this title are satisfied before or at that time; or

when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-705.
Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

Preeffective-date action; one-year perfection period unless reperfected. If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before this title takes effect and the action would have resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before this title takes effect, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under this title within one year after this takes effect. An attached security interest becomes unperfected one year after this title takes effect unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under this title before the expiration of that period.

Preeffective-date filing. The filing of a financing statement before this title takes effect is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this title.

Preeffective-date filing in jurisdiction formerly governing perfection. This title does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before this title takes effect, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former § 8.9-103. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (e) and §

8.9A-706

, the financing statement ceases to be effective at the earlier of:

the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the jurisdiction in which it is filed; or

June 30, 2006.

Continuation statement. The filing of a continuation statement after this title takes effect does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before this title takes effect. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement after this title takes effect and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 (§

8.9A-301

et seq.) of this title, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before this title takes effect continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Application of subsection (c) (2) to transmitting utility financing statement. Subsection (c) (2) applies to a financing statement that, before this title takes effect, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former § 8.9-103 only to the extent that Part 3 (§

8.9A-301

et seq.) of this title provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

Application of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.) of this title. A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before this title takes effect and a continuation statement filed after this title takes effect is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Part 5 for an initial financing statement.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-706.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

Initial financing statement in lieu of continuation statement. The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this title takes effect if:

the filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this title;

the preeffective-date financing statement was filed in an office in another state or another office in this Commonwealth; and

the initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c).

Period of continued effectiveness. The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) continues the effectiveness of the preeffective-date financing statement:

if the initial financing statement is filed before this title takes effect, for the period provided in former § 8.9-403 with respect to a financing statement; and

if the initial financing statement is filed after this title takes effect, for the period provided in §

8.9A-515

with respect to an initial financing statement.

Requirements for initial financing statement under subsection (a). To be effective for purposes of subsection (a), an initial financing statement must:

satisfy the requirements of Part 5 (§

8.9A-501

et seq.) of this title for an initial financing statement;

identify the preeffective-date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

indicate that the preeffective-date financing statement remains effective.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-707.
Amendment of preeffective-date financing statement.

Preeffective-date financing statement. In this section, “preeffective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before this title takes effect.

Applicable law. After this title takes effect, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a preeffective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 (§

8.9A-301

et seq.) of this title. However, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Method of amending; general rule. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), if the law of this Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a preeffective-date financing statement may be amended after this title takes effect only if:

the preeffective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

;

an amendment is filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies §

8.9A-706 (c)

; or

an initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies §

8.9A-706 (c)

is filed in the office specified in §

8.9A-501

.

Method of amending; continuation. If the law of this Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement may be continued only under §

8.9A-705 (d)

and (f) or §

8.9A-706

.

Method of amending; additional termination rule. Whether or not the law of this Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a preeffective-date financing statement filed in this Commonwealth may be terminated after this title takes effect by filing a termination statement in the office in which the preeffective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies §

8.9A-706 (c)

has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 (§

8.9A-301

et seq.) of this title as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-708.
Persons entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

the filing is necessary under this part:

to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this title takes effect; or

to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

This section conforms to § 9-707 in the uniform act.

§ 8.9A-709.
Priority.

Law governing priority. This title determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before this title takes effect, former Title 8.9 determines priority.

Priority if security interest becomes enforceable under §

8.9A-203

. For purposes of §

8.9A-322 (a)

, the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under §

8.9A-203

dates from the time this title takes effect if the security interest is perfected under this title by the filing of a financing statement before this title takes effect which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former Title 8.9. This subsection does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

This section conforms to § 9-708 in the uniform act.